District of Columbia statutes.
1-303.44

Regulations for construction, repair, and operation of elevators.

(a)

The Council of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and directed to make and publish such orders as may be necessary to regulate the construction, repair, and operation of all elevators within the District of Columbia, and prescribe such means of security as may be found necessary to protect life and limb.

(b)

Any person or persons, or corporation, who shall neglect or refuse to comply with the orders made pursuant to this section shall, upon conviction thereof in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, on information filed in the name of the District of Columbia, be fined not less than $10 nor more than $100 for each offense.

(c)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the orders made pursuant to this section in accordance with Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this section shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Mar. 3, 1887, 24 Stat. 580, ch. 390, §§ 1, 2
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
March 3, 1887, § 3
as added Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 481, 32 DCR 4450
1981 Ed., § 1-323.
1973 Ed., § 1-229.

New implementing regulations: Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1982: The “Elevator Code Amendment Act of 1981” (D.C. Law 4-91, Mar. 31, 1982, 29 DCR 683).

Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1984: The “Apartment House Elevator Act of 1984” (D.C. Law 5-132, Mar. 13, 1985, 32 DCR 1717).

Delegation of authority under law promulgating rules for adoption of new construction codes, see Mayor’s Order 84-146, August 23, 1984.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(6) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.